Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 8

Civil Rights Act of 1990

4-21-801. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Civil Rights Act of 1990.”

Acts 1990, ch. 1053, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71.

4-21-802. State activities and expenditures prohibited.

No state official, employee or agency shall sponsor or organize a meeting or other activity, the purpose of which is related to state business, including any athletic competition, in an establishment or facility that does not afford full membership rights and privileges to a person because of sex, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, national origin or disability.

No state funds shall be expended in connection with a meeting or other activity held at an establishment or facility that does not afford full membership rights and privileges to a person because of sex, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, national origin or disability.

No state official, employee or agent shall be reimbursed for dues or other expenses incurred at an establishment or facility that does not afford full membership rights and privileges to a person because of sex, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, national origin or disability.

This section shall not apply to state officials, employees or agents acting in the course of ongoing law enforcement, code enforcement or other required investigations and inspections.

For the purposes of this section, a “public official” is a person who holds an elected or appointed position in state government.

Acts 1990, ch. 1053, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§4-21-802(a) and4-21-803(a) are defensible from a facial constitutional challenge. OAG 13-20, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/13/13).

4-21-803. Commercial agreements with the state — Prohibition — Required statement.

No state official, employee or agent shall enter into a commercial agreement on behalf of the state with a club that denies to a person entry, use of facilities or membership, or unreasonably prevents the full enjoyment of such club on the basis of sex, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, national origin or disability.

Prior to entering into a commercial agreement with the state, a club must file a statement, verified by the president or chief executive officer of the club, that it does not deny a person entry, use of facilities or membership or unreasonably prevent the full enjoyment of such club on the basis of sex, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, national origin or disability.

Acts 1990, ch. 1053, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Jurisdiction, Venue and “Localized Actions” in Tennessee (June F. Entman), 39 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2003).

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§4-21-802(a) and4-21-803(a) are defensible from a facial constitutional challenge. OAG 13-20, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/13/13).

4-21-804. Higher education adjunct organizations — Provision of discriminatory club membership prohibited.

No adjunct organization, including, but not limited to, booster groups, of a state university, community college or institution of higher learning shall enter into a contract on behalf of, or purchase membership for, an employee of such university, college or institution of higher learning to a club that denies to a person entry, use of facilities or membership, or unreasonably prevents the full enjoyment of such club on the basis of sex, race, creed, color, religion, ancestry, national origin or disability.

Acts 1990, ch. 1053, § 4.

4-21-805. Enforcement.

The state of Tennessee or a person who is discriminated against in violation of this part may enforce this part by means of a civil action.

A person found to violate any of this part is liable for the actual damages caused by such violation and such other amount as may be determined by a jury or a court sitting without a jury, but in no case less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), plus, in addition thereto, reasonable attorney's fees and court costs as may be determined by the court.

A person who commits an act or engages in any pattern and practice of discrimination in violation of this part may be enjoined therefrom by a court of competent jurisdiction.

An action for injunction under this subsection (b) may be brought by a person who is discriminated against in violation of this part by the state, or by a person or entity that will fairly and adequately represent the interests of the protected class.

Nothing in this part shall preclude any person from seeking any other remedies, penalties or procedures provided by law. No criminal penalties shall attach for a violation of this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 1053, § 5.

4-21-806. Exemption — Religious organizations.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit a religious organization or any organization operating solely for religious, charitable, educational or social welfare purposes from restricting membership or facilities to persons of the same religious faith, where necessary to promote the religious principles under which it was established and is currently maintained.

This exemption applies only to organizations whose primary purpose is to serve members of a particular religion.

Acts 1990, ch. 1053, § 6.